Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2301 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A banking institution, at its discretion, may allow a surviving
spouse to take control of any bank account of the deceased, which
shall include but is not limited to checking and savings accounts.
Before allowing the surviving spouse to take control of any account
owned by the deceased, the banking institution shall require a death
certificate for the deceased which lists the name of the surviving
spouses along with two forms of government issued identification
with one being a photo identification which shall include but is not
Req. No. 10360 Page 1

limi ted to a driver license and passport. The name of the spouse
listed on the death certificate must match the name on the
government issued identification. The banking institution shall
make photo or digital copies of the death certificate and the two
forms of identification and maintain such copies for their records
and shall maintain such records for ten (10) years.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10360 JL 01/14/25















Req. No. 10360 Page 2